Wisconsin, session 2025, AB755.
do enact as follows:AB755,11Section 1. 632.895 (17) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB755,2,52632.895 (17) (b) 2. Outpatient consultations, examinations, procedures, and 3medical services that are necessary to prescribe, administer, maintain, or remove a 4contraceptive, if covered for any other drug benefits under the policy or plan 5sterilization procedures, and patient education and counseling.AB755,26Section 2. Initial applicability.AB755,2,97(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 8act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 9subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).AB755,2,1410(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 11agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 12policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 13on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 14modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB755,315Section 3. Effective date.AB755,2,1716(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 17publication.AB755,2,1818